Utah statutes.
32A-6-602 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Health professions exemption.

Any licensed physician, dentist, veterinarian, or pharmacist, acting within the scope of professional responsibility, who prescribes, prepares, or administers alcoholic products to any person being treated or serviced professionally, does not violate this title and is not required to hold any type of permit or license in order to use alcoholic products professionally.

